Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature hereby finds that:


1. Section 10 of Article I of the United States Constitution


limits states from coining money or making anything but gold and


silver coin legal tender in payment of debts. This act does not

Req. No. 3486 Page 1


establish Bitcoin as legal tender but recognizes its use as a


financial instrument and medium of exchange within existing legal


frameworks;


2. The Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution


reserves to the states powers not delegated to the federal


government. Oklahoma has the authority to regulate its financial


operations, investments, and partnerships, including Bitcoin


transactions, within the bounds of federal law;


3. Section 36 of Article II of the Oklahoma Constitution


provides the state with the power to legislate for the general


welfare. This act supports the general welfare by fostering


innovation, increasing fiscal transparency, and encouraging economic


growth through the integration of Bitcoin; and


4. The purpose of this act is to:


a. establish a framework for the secure use of Bitcoin by


the State of Oklahoma, private businesses, and


individual residents,


b. authorize Bitcoin as an acceptable medium for


transactions, salaries, and investments, and


c. ensure compliance with all state and federal legal


requirements.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 100a of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 3486 Page 2


As used in this act:


1. “Bitcoin” means the decentralized digital asset and peer-to-


peer payment network first launched in 2009 pursuant to Satoshi


Nakamoto’s white paper titled “Bitcoin: A Peer-to-Peer Electronic


Cash System” whose distributed ledger is traceable to the Bitcoin


Genesis Block, is maintained through a proof-of-work consensus


mechanism, and whose native unit of account is commonly denominated


as BTC;


2. “Digital assets” means a natively electronic representation


of value, ownership, or access rights that is recorded or


transferable on a distributed or cryptographically secured ledger,


including virtual currencies, cryptocurrencies, stablecoins, and


non-fungible tokens whether or not denominated in legal tender;


3. “Self-hosted wallet” means a software, hardware, or


cryptographic keys necessary to access and transfer such digital


assets, without reliance on a third-party custodian; and


4. “Governing authority” means any board, commission,


department, or other agency of the state or any political


subdivision in this state.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 105 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any firm that deals


with digital assets and does not accept United States currency

Req. No. 3486 Page 3


payments or exchanges digital assets for United States currency


shall not be required to obtain a state money transmitter license


under Section 1513 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 73.2 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any employee of this state, business, corporation, other


entity, and resident of this state may negotiate and receive payment


and compensation, including salaries, wages, and other forms of


compensation, in Bitcoin.


B. At the creation of a purchase order, any vendor may elect to


receive payment in the form of Bitcoin pursuant to the provisions of


subsection A of this section. Such election shall be binding for


the specific purchase order or transaction. Payments shall be


valued based on the market value of Bitcoin at the time of the


transaction unless otherwise agreed upon in writing which may be


kept solely as an electronic record.


C. Any employee of this state electing to receive payment in


Bitcoin pursuant to this section shall:


1. Come to an agreement with this state whether the payment of


compensation in Bitcoin will be:


a. based on the market value of Bitcoin at the beginning


of the pay period, or



Req. No. 3486 Page 4


b. based on the market value of Bitcoin at the time of


payment;


2. Document in writing agreements made pursuant to paragraph 1


of this subsection, which may be kept electronically and maintained


by this state for that pay period;


3. Be granted the option at the start of each pay period to


revise his or her election to receive payment in Bitcoin or United


States dollars or some combination thereof. If no adjustment is


made, the agreement from the previous pay period will hold; and


4. Deposit payments in the self-hosted wallet of the employee


or to an account designed by the employee, but controlled by a third


party, which can safely hold Bitcoin.


D. The State Treasurer shall put out a request for proposal for


a firm dealing with digital assets to implement the provisions of


this act for paying state employees and vendors with Bitcoin. The


State Treasurer shall consider the following factors when


determining a firm to implement the processing of Bitcoin payments


pursuant to the provisions of this act:


1. The fees associated with paying state employees and vendors


in Bitcoin;


2. The speed of paying state employees and vendors in Bitcoin;


3. The cybersecurity protocols of the firm applying;


4. The ability of the firm to provide custody solutions to


employees and vendors;

Req. No. 3486 Page 5


5. Any license the firm may hold with this state; and


6. Any other factors the State Treasurer deems relevant.


E. The State Treasurer shall enter into a contract with a firm


pursuant to the provisions of subsection D of this section no later


than January 1, 2027.


F. The State Treasurer may promulgate rules to effectuate the


provisions of this act.


G. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall issue guidance on the tax


implications of receiving digital assets as payment no later than


January 1, 2027.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3486 CAD 1/15/2026 11:40:34 AM























Req. No. 3486 Page 6